Louisiana, session 2026, HB1064.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:842.5 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§842.5. Domestic Violence Intervention Court Pilot Program; Nineteenth Judicial
District Court
A. The legislature hereby finds and declares that domestic violence remains
a significant public safety and public health issue in this state. Traditional
sentencing models have not sufficiently reduced recidivism among domestic
violence offenders. Evidence-based intervention courts that combine judicial
supervision with treatment, accountability, and victim safety planning have
demonstrated improved outcomes. Post-adjudication domestic violence courts
promote victim safety, offender accountability, reduced recidivism, and coordinated
community response. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to establish a
two-year pilot Domestic Violence Intervention Court within the Nineteenth Judicial
District Court to evaluate effectiveness and to determine feasibility for a statewide
expansion.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1064 ENROLLED
B.(1) There is hereby established a two-year pilot program known as the
Domestic Violence Intervention Court, referred to in this Section as the "DVIC",
within the Nineteenth Judicial District Court.
(2) The DVIC shall operate as a post-adjudication specialty court for eligible
defendants convicted of misdemeanor or felony offenses including but not limited
to second degree battery, aggravated battery, and other domestic abuse-related
offenses.
(3) Participation in the program is voluntary. A defendant may consult with
legal counsel prior to entering a guilty plea and being sentenced to the DVIC.
Participation shall be ordered as a special condition of probation to be completed in
addition to all other conditions of probation in accordance with Code of Criminal
Procedure Articles 893 et seq. Participants shall be subject to the supervision and
authority of the DVIC presiding judge. The presiding judge may, at any time during
the probationary period, impose additional conditions of probation as authorized by
Code of Criminal Procedure Articles 893 et seq. Final eligibility to participate in the
program shall be determined by the presiding judge of the DVIC.
C.(1) Eligible participants include defendants who are convicted of domestic
abuse-related offenses and assessed as at-risk of reoffending using validated risk
assessment tools.
(2) Participants shall do all of the following:
(a) Appear regularly before the court.
(b) Comply with individualized case plans.
(c) Be subject to graduated sanctions and incentives.
D. The DVIC shall provide all of the following:
(1) Batterer intervention programming that includes the following
components:
(a) A nationally recognized, evidence-based, cognitive behavioral therapy
model specifically designed for domestic abuse.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1064 ENROLLED
(b) The Stop, Take a step back, Observe, Proceed mindfully (STOP)
technique for screening, trauma-informed assessment, and cognitive behavioral
restructuring.
(2) Clinical assessment and individualized treatment planning.
(3) Substance abuse screening and referral when appropriate.
(4) Mental health screening and referral.
(5) Employment readiness assistance.
(6) Housing and transportation assistance.
(7) Case management services, including compliance monitoring and
coordination with probation.
E.(1) Nothing in this Section shall be construed as requiring a victim's
participation in the DVIC. All services are voluntary and available to the victim
regardless of participation status. The rights and services available to victims are in
addition to those rights as defined in R.S. 46:1844 et seq. The DVIC shall prioritize
victim safety in all phases of participation.
(2) Victims participating in the DVIC shall be provided with the following
services and protections:
(a) A victim services advocate prior to a defendant entering the DVIC to
assist with representation, services, and other assistance as required by the victim.
(b) Notification of all court proceedings and compliance statuses.
(c) Attendance of the victim services advocate at court proceedings to
provide information if the victim is unable or unwilling to attend in person but
wishes to have matters addressed by the court.
(d) Safety planning information and referrals to community-based
organizations.
(e) Information regarding local domestic violence shelters.
(f) Trauma-informed support services.
(g) An award of restitution, when applicable.
(h) Authorization to request GPS monitoring of the defendant, when
applicable.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1064 ENROLLED
F. The DVIC shall operate with a coordinated team, including but not limited
to the following:
(1) The presiding judge.
(2) The district attorney.
(3) The public defender.
(4) A probation officer.
(5) A clinical provider.
(6) A program coordinator.
(7) A case manager.
(8) A victim services advocate.
G.(1) The program shall collect data including all of the following:
(a) Recidivism rates.
(b) Program completion rates.
(c) Compliance with protective orders.
(d) Victim safety indicators.
(2) An independent evaluator shall conduct annual and final evaluations of
participants.
(3) A report shall be submitted by the Nineteenth Judicial District Court to
the legislature and the Louisiana Supreme Court at the conclusion of the two-year
pilot program.
H. The pilot program authorized by this Section shall be effective for a
period of two years unless extended by the legislature.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.